Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5551.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1107. (1) A person shall not engage in or work at the business of a plumbing contractor, master plumber, journey plumber, or apprentice plumber unless that person is licensed or registered under this article. Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3), only a licensed master or journey plumber shall perform plumbing. A licensed master plumber shall be is in charge and responsible for proper installation and conformance with the state construction code. Plumbing shall must not be performed unless the plumbing contractor who is responsible has obtained a permit from the this state or a governmental subdivision authorized to issue permits. (2) A license under this article is not required to perform any of the following work: (a) Minor repair work. (b) The installation of a building sewer or water service pipe, if a permit is secured from the responsible enforcing agency and inspections are performed. The installations shall must comply with the applicable parts of the state construction code. (c) The installation of domestic water treatment and filtering equipment that requires modification to an existing cold water distribution supply and associated waste piping in buildings if a permit is secured, required inspections performed, and the installation complies with the applicable parts of the state construction code. If the enforcing agency determines a violation exists, the responsible installer must correct it.the violation. (d) The installation by a homeowner of his or her the homeowner's own plumbing, building sewer, or private sewer in his or her the homeowner's single-family dwelling if a permit is secured. (e) The installation of medical gas piping, if the installation is performed under the supervision of a licensed plumbing contractor. (f) The testing of a backflow preventer if the individual who performs the testing holds an active ASSE 5110 certification as a backflow prevention assembly tester. (g) The testing of a backflow prevention assembly on an automatic fire suppression system. (3) This article does not prevent a person from performing any activities within the scope of licensure or registration under any other licensure or registration act or applicable codes for that licensed or registered professional adopted pursuant to under law.